Massachusetts, session 194th, H4313.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Purpose.
The purpose of this act is to allow the Town of North Brookfield, including the Board of
Selectmen, the School Committee, the Planning Board and all other elected or appointed boards
and committees, or municipal officials, to satisfy the legal notice requirements entirely by digital
publications in light of the lack of an available adequate print newspaper in the community.
SECTION 2. Process.
Where legal notice in a newspaper or a newspaper of general circulation is required by
statute, bylaw, or judicial order, alternative means of posting such notice, as specified in section
3 of this Act, may be used if approved by a majority vote of the public body or at the discretion
of the municipal official legally required to post such notice.
SECTION 3. Means of Legal Notice Publication.
of 2

Notwithstanding Massachusetts General Law c. 4 § 13(b) and subject to Section 2 of this
Act, whenever legal notice in a newspaper or newspaper of general circulation is required by
statute, bylaw, or judicial order, such notice requirement shall be satisfied by posting notice in
one or more of the following places:
(A) A print newspaper of local or general circulation;
(B) A newspaper's website;
(C) Websites reporting local news and opinion which satisfy the criteria for digital
publication as set forth in
G.L. c. 4 § 13(b);
(D) A statewide website that may be maintained as a repository for such notices; or
(E) A townwide website that may be maintained as a repository for such notices.
SECTION 4. Legal Requirements.
Nothing set forth in this Act shall be construed to alter or amend the timing requirements
of the publication of legal notices set forth in the Massachusetts General Laws, bylaw, or judicial
order.
SECTION 5.
This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2